Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-750
Rule, regulation, or policy; waiver authorized.

The State Board of Education may waive any rule or regulation of the State Department of Education and the board of education of each participating school may waive any school board policy which has been identified as a barrier in any school restructuring plan upon a showing that such rule, regulation, or policy will be a substantial impediment to success of the plan.

Laws 1990, LB 960, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,227;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 424.